District of Columbia statutes.
29-106.04

Judicial review of denial of reinstatement.

(a)

If the Mayor denies a domestic filing entity’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the Mayor shall serve the entity pursuant to § 29-104.12 with a notice in a record that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(b)

An entity may seek judicial review of denial of reinstatement in the Superior Court not later than 30 days after service of the notice of denial.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720